Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65A.299, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of grants. (a) A grant under this section must be used to retrofit an insurable property. (b) Grant money provided under this section must not be used for maintenance or repairs, but may be used in conjunction with repairs or reconstruction necessitated by damage from wind or hail. (c) A project funded by a grant under this section must be completed within deleted text begin threedeleted text end new text begin sixnew text end months of the date the grant is approved. Failure to complete the project in a timely manner may result in forfeiture of the grant. new text begin (d) As a condition of receiving a grant under this section, the commissioner must certify to the insurer providing the homeowner's insurance policy that the property meets applicable program standards. The commissioner must notify the insurer providing the homeowner's insurance policy when work at a grant recipient's property is complete and the property meets the definition of insurable property under section 65A.298, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65A.299, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Applicant eligibility. The commissioner must develop (1) administrative procedures to implement this section, and (2) criteria used to determine whether an applicant is eligible for a grant under this sectionnew text begin , including preference for homeowners whose household income is at or below 115 percent of the area median income, as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Developmentnew text end . Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $35,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the strengthen Minnesota homes account under Minnesota Statutes, section 65A.299, subdivision 4, to issue grants and administer the program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end